Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4218
Administration of pool; submit plan of operation; procedure.

The board shall submit to the department a plan of operation for the pool and any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the pool. The director shall, after notice and hearing, approve the plan of operation if the plan assures the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the pool. The plan of operation shall become effective upon approval in writing by the director consistent with the date on which the coverage under the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act is required to be made available. If the board fails to submit an acceptable plan of operation or fails to submit acceptable amendments to the plan, the director shall, after notice and hearing, adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary or advisable to effectuate the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. Such rules and regulations shall continue in force until modified by the director or superseded by a plan submitted by the board and approved by the director.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 18;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 32.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.